Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.173, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. deleted text begin Biennialdeleted text end new text begin Decennialnew text end reviewdeleted text begin ; legislative reportdeleted text end . The council and the advisory metropolitan land use committee shall review and assess the rules deleted text begin following their effective date and at least every two years thereafter.deleted text end new text begin by January 15 of each year ending in the numeral "5."new text end No major alteration or amendments to standards for determining metropolitan significance shall be put into effect by the council until 90 days deleted text begin have elapsed following a report to the legislature in whichdeleted text end new text begin afternew text end the alteration or amendment was proposed and recommended by the council in the form of a proposed rule published under section 14.14, subdivision 1a, or 14.22. deleted text begin The report to the legislature must be made during the month of January.deleted text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.254, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Affordable, life-cycle goals. The council shall negotiate with each municipality to establish affordable and life-cycle housing goals for that municipality that are consistent with and promote the policies of the Metropolitan Council as provided in the adopted Metropolitan Development Guide. The council shall adopt, by deleted text begin resolution after a public hearingdeleted text end new text begin action of its governing bodynew text end , the negotiated affordable and life-cycle housing goals for each municipality deleted text begin by January 15, 1996, anddeleted text end by January 15 deleted text begin indeleted text end new text begin ofnew text end each deleted text begin succeedingdeleted text end year for each municipality newly electing to participate in the program or for each municipality with which new housing goals have been negotiated. By deleted text begin June 30, 1996, and bydeleted text end June 30 deleted text begin indeleted text end new text begin ofnew text end each deleted text begin succeedingdeleted text end year for each municipality newly electing to participate in the program or for each municipality with which new housing goals have been negotiated, each municipality shall identify to the council the actions it plans to take to meet the established housing goals. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.254, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Distribution of funds. The funds in the account must be distributed annually by the council to municipalities that: (1) have not met their affordable and life-cycle housing goals as determined by the council; and (2) are actively funding projects designed to help meet the goals. Funds may also be distributed to a development authority for a project in an eligible municipality. deleted text begin The funds distributed by the council must be matched on a dollar-for-dollar basis by the municipality or development authority receiving the funds.deleted text end When distributing funds in the account, the council must give priority to projects that (1) are in municipalities that have contribution net tax capacities that exceed their distribution net tax capacities by more than $200 per household, new text begin and new text end (2) demonstrate the proposed project will link employment opportunities with affordable and life-cycle housingdeleted text begin , and (3) provide matching funds from a source other than the required affordable and life-cycle housing opportunities amount under subdivision 3 or 3a, as applicabledeleted text end . For the purposes of this subdivision, "municipality" means a statutory or home rule charter city or town in the metropolitan area and "development authority" means a housing and redevelopment authority, economic development authority, or port authority. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.351, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Allocation formula. By deleted text begin July 1deleted text end new text begin May 15new text end of every year each implementing agency must submit to the Metropolitan Parks and Open Space Commission a statement of the next annual anticipated operation and maintenance expenditures of the regional recreation open space parks systems within their respective jurisdictions and the deleted text begin previous year'sdeleted text end actual expendituresnew text begin from the most recent annual audited financial statementnew text end . After reviewing the actual expenditures new text begin from the most recent annual audited financial statements new text end submitted and by July 15 of each year, the parks and open space commission shall forward to the Metropolitan Council the funding requests from the implementing agencies based on the actual expenditures deleted text begin madedeleted text end new text begin from the most recent annual audited financial statementsnew text end . The Metropolitan Council shall distribute the operation and maintenance money as follows: (1) 40 percent based on the use that each implementing agency's regional recreation open space system has in proportion to the total use of the metropolitan regional recreation open space system; (2) 40 percent based on the operation and maintenance expenditures made in the previous year by each implementing agency in proportion to the total operation and maintenance expenditures of all of the implementing agencies; and (3) 20 percent based on the acreage that each implementing agency's regional recreation open space system has in proportion to the total acreage of the metropolitan regional recreation open space system. The 80 percent natural resource management land acreage of the park reserves must be divided by four in calculating the distribution under this clause. Each implementing agency must receive no less than 40 percent of its actual operation and maintenance expenses new text begin from the most recent annual audited financial statements new text end to be incurred in the current calendar year budget as submitted to the parks and open space commission. If the available operation and maintenance money is less than the total amount determined by the formula including the preceding, the implementing agencies will share the available money in proportion to the amounts they would otherwise be entitled to under the formula. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473H.08, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Expiration by authority. The authority may initiate expiration by notifying the landowner by registered letter on a form provided by the commissioner of agriculture, provided that before notification deleted text begin (i) the comprehensive plan and the zoning for the land have been officially amended so that the land is no longer planned for long-term agriculture and is no longer zoned for long-term agriculture, evidenced by a maximum residential density permitting more than one unit per quarter/quarter, and (ii)deleted text end the authority has certified deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end changes pursuant to section 473H.04, subdivision 2. The notice shall describe the property for which expiration is desired and shall state the date of expiration which shall be at least eight years from the date of notice.new text begin Within six months of issuing notice, the authority shall amend the comprehensive plan and the zoning for the land, pursuant to sections 473.854 and 473.865, so that the land is no longer planned for long-term agriculture and is no longer zoned for long-term agriculture, evidenced by a maximum residential density permitting more than one unit per quarter/quarter.new text end Sec. 6. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION.new text end new text begin This act is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end